Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Determination of Heirship

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Descent and Distribution §§ 41-50, 52-53, 55-59, 62, 64-125, 127-133.

Lack of final settlement of intestate's estate as affecting heir's right to partition of realty, 92 ALR3d 473.

26B C.J.S. Descent and Distribution §§ 82 to 88.

§ 2-9-201.
Application by petition two years after death; where filed.

When more than two (2) years have elapsed since the death of a person residing in this state, or residing outside of this state but owning real estate or any interest therein situated within this state, or who has made entry on any government lands and has not received patent therefor, and there has been no previous, record judicial determination of the decedent’s heirs or the right of descent of the real property interest, any heir of the deceased or other person having derived title to any real property or any interest therein from the deceased or from any of his heirs either by direct or mesne conveyances, may make application by petition to the court or commissioner of the county in which the deceased was a resident at the time of his death, or if a nonresident of the state at the time of his death then in the district court of the county where the real estate or some part thereof belonging to the deceased in his lifetime is situated, for determination of the time of death of the decedent and a determination of the heirs of the deceased, the degree of kinship and the right of descent of the real property belonging to the deceased.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 154, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-4101; Laws 1945, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-2601; W.S. 1957, § 2-325; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-501; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited in

In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 14, 2014).

Law reviews. —

See note, “Probate Procedure — Distinctions Between the Probate and Civil Arms of the District Courts,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1965).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-9-202.
Application by petition two years after death; fixing time for hearing; notice thereof; contents.

Upon filing the petition the court shall fix a time for hearing the petition not less than thirty (30) days after the filing thereof. Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given to all persons interested in the proceeding including creditors, heirs and devisees, setting forth the filing of the petition, the date of the supposed death of the deceased, his place of residence, a description of the real property or interest therein of which he died seized or a description of the real property on which he had made an entry but had not yet received patent and the interest in the real estate of the petitioner. The notice shall be published once a week in a newspaper of general circulation in the county for four (4) consecutive weeks prior to the hearing, and shall be mailed simultaneously with the first publication to those persons designated in W.S.

2-7-205

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 154, § 2; 1931, ch. 73, § 168a; R.S. 1931, § 88-4102; Laws 1945, ch. 79, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 6-2602; W.S. 1957, § 2-326; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-502; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-9-203.
Application by petition two years after death; hearing; determination and decree.

Upon hearing, if it appears to the court that more than two (2) years have elapsed since the death of the deceased, that he died seized of an interest in lands in this state or that he died intestate having entered government lands and not having received a patent therefor, and there has been no previous record judicial determination of the decedent’s heirs or the right of descent of the real property interest, the court shall determine the date of the decedent’s death, who were the heirs of the deceased upon the date of death, their degree of kinship, the right of descent of the real property or interest therein of which the deceased died seized or on which he had made an entry but had not yet received a patent therefor and the distribution each heir is entitled to receive from the known and unknown real property interests of the decedent based on the determination of the right of descent, and shall make and enter its decree accordingly.

The findings of the court relating to a decedent’s date of death, intestacy, heirs, degree of kinship and right of descent shall apply to any other real property in this state subsequently discovered in which the decedent had a property interest at the time of his death as identified by an affidavit recorded pursuant to W.S.

34-11-101

, provided that:

A copy of the judicial determination of the decedent’s heirs or right of descent shall be included with an affidavit filed under W.S.

34-11-101

for the subsequently discovered property;

No other recorded judicial determination has been made relating to the right of descent for that property.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 154, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 88-4103; Laws 1945, ch. 79, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 6-2603; W.S. 1957, § 2-327; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-503; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2020 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added “and the distribution each heir is entitled to receive from the known and unknown real property interests of the decedent based on the determination of the right of descent” following “patent therefor” and made stylistic changes; and added (b).

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 154, Laws 1925, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Decree of descent does not create title;

it merely declares who has acquired the title of decedent, and it operates only with respect to decedent's interest in the property described in the decree. Insofar as a decree of descent purports to do more, it is void and subject to collateral attack. Stroock v. Kirby Royalties, 494 P.2d 197,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1972).

Heirs cannot have interests in decedent's property higher than those which decedent had himself.

Stroock v. Kirby Royalties, 494 P.2d 197,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1972).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-9-204.
Procedure when applicant for public land dies and patent issued to heirs.

Whenever any person makes entry on any land in the United States and dies before patent for the same is issued and patent thereafter is issued to the heirs at law of the decedent, any person interested in the lands as heir at law or devisee or as grantee or assignee of such heirs at law or devisee, or the personal representative of any of them if deceased, may file a petition in the district court in and for the county wherein the land or any part thereof is situate, setting forth the date of death of the decedent, the date of issuance of the patent and that the patent was issued to the heirs at law of the deceased person, the land described therein, the names, ages and residence if known of the heirs at law of the deceased persons and a request that a decree be entered by the court establishing who are the heirs at law of the deceased person. Upon filing of the petition the clerk of court shall make an order fixing the time and place of hearing of the petition not less than thirty (30) days from the filing of the petition.

Notice of the time and place for hearing the petition shall be given by publishing notice thereof at least once each week for three (3) successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the county and the mailing of true copies to all known heirs of the deceased person at least ten (10) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. Proof of publication and mailing shall be made to the court upon the hearing. Any time before the date fixed for the hearing any person interested in the lands as heir at law or devisee of the decedent or as the grantee of any such heir at law or devisee, may answer the petition and deny any of the matters contained therein. At the time fixed for the hearing or at such time thereafter as may be fixed by the court, the court shall hear the proofs offered by petitioner and any person answering the same, and shall make a decree conformable to the proofs. The decree shall have the same force and effect as decrees entered in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 144, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 6-2604; W.S. 1957, § 2-328; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-504; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to applicability of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see §

2-2-308

.

For provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure, see title 1.

As to public lands generally, see title 36.